hyphen-patterns/ushyph.txt
% patterns
.ach4
.ad4der
.af1t
.al3t
.am5at
.an3te
.an5c
.ang4
.ani5m
.ant4
.anti5s
.ar4tie
.ar4ty
.ar5s
.as1p
.as1s
.as3c
.aster5
.atom5
.au1d
.av4i
.awn4
.ba4g
.ba5na
.bas4e
.be3sm
.be5ra
.be5sto
.ber4
.bri2
.but4ti
.ca4t
.cam4pe
.can5c
.capa5b
.car5ol
.ce4la
.ch4
.chill5i
.ci2
.cit5r
.co3e
.co4r
.cor5ner
.de3o
.de3ra
.de3ri
.de4moi
.des4c
.dictio5
.do4t
.driv4
.du4c
.dumb5
.earth5
.eas3i
.eb4
.eer4
.eg2
.el3em
.el5d
.en3g
.en3s
.enam3
.eq5ui5t
.er4ri
.es3
.eth1y6l1
.eu3
.eu4ler
.ev2
.eye5
.fes3
.for5mer
.ga2
.ga4som
.ge2
.ge4ome
.ge5og
.gen3t4
.gi4b
.gi5a
.go4r
.han5k
.hand5i
.he2
.he3p6a
.hero5i
.hes3
.het3
.hi3b
.hi3er
.hon3o
.hon5ey
.hov5
.id4l
.idol3
.im3m
.im5pin
.in1
.in2k
.in3ci
.in3s
.in5u2t
.ine2
.ir5r
.is4i
.ju3r
.kil2ni
.ko6rte
.la4cy
.la4m
.lat5er
.lath5
.le2
.le6ice
.leg5e
.len4
.lep5
.lev1
.li2n
.li3o
.li4g
.li4t
.lig5a
.mag5a5
.mal5o
.man5a
.mar5ti
.me2
.me4gal
.me5ter
.mer3c
.met4ala
.mimi4cr
.mis1
.mis4ers
.mist5i
.mo3ro
.mon3e
.mu5ta
.muta5b
.ne6o3f
.ni4c
.non1e2m
.od2
.odd5
.of5te
.or1d
.or3c
.or3t
.or5ato
.os3
.os4tl
.oth3
.out3
.pe5te
.pe5tit
.ped5al
.pi2t
.pi4e
.pio5n
.pre3m
.ra4c
.ran4t
.ratio5na
.re5mit
.re5stat
.ree2
.ree4c
.res2
.ri4g
.rit5u
.ro4q
.ros5t
.row5d
.ru4d
.sci3e
.se2n
.se5rie
.self5
.sell5
.sem4ic
.sem6is4
.semi5
.semid6
.semip4
.semir4
.semiv4
.sh2
.si2
.sing4
.sph6in1
.st4
.sta5bl
.sy2
.ta4
.te4
.ten5an
.th2
.ti2
.til4
.tim5o5
.tin5k
.ting4
.to2q
.to4p
.to6pog
.ton4a
.top5i
.tou5s
.trib5ut
.un1a
.un1e
.un3ce
.un3u
.un5k
.un5o
.under5
.up3
.ure3
.us5a
.ve5ra
.ven4de
.vi4car
.we2b1l
.wil5i
.ye4
1bat
1bel
1bil
1c4l4
1ca
1cen
1ci
1co
1cus
1cy
1d2a
1d4i3a
1den
1di1v
1dina
1dio
1do
1dr
1du
1eff
1exp
1fa
1fi
1fo
1fy
1ga
1gen
1geo
1gi4a
1gle
1go
1gr
1gy
1head
1hous
1je
1k2no
1kee
1l4ine
1lent
1lut
1ly
1ma
1men
1mo
1mu
1na
1nen
1nes
1nou
1o1gis
1ogy
1p2l2
1p4or
1pa
1phy
1pole.
1pos
1room
1sio
1sis
1siv
1so
1su
1ta
1tee
1tent
1teo
1teri
1tia
1tim
1tio
1tiv
1tiz
1to
1tra
1tu
1ty
1va
1wo2
1zo
2a2r
2adi
2ale
2ang
2b1b
2b3if
2b5s2
2bf
2bt
2c1it
2c1t
2c5ah
2ce.
2cen4e
2ch
2cim
2cin
2cog
2d1ed
2d1s2
2d3a4b
2d3lo
2d5of
2dag
2de.
2dly
2e1b
2e2da
2erb
2ere.
2ero
2ess
2estr
2f3ic.
2f3s
2fed
2fin
2ft
2g5y3n
2gam
2ge.
2ged
2gue
2h1n
2i1a
2i1no
2ici
2id
2ie4
2ig
2ilit
2in.
2in4th
2ine
2ini
2inn
2ins
2int.
2io
2ip
2is.
2is1c
2ite
2ith
2itio
2iv
2l1b
2l1n2
2l1s2
2l1w
2l3h
2ld
2lf
2lm
2lout
2lp
2lys4
2mab
2mah
2med
2mes
2mh
2n1a2b
2n1s2
2ne.
2ned
2nes.
2nest
2ogyn
2ok
2ond
2oph
2p1s2
2p1t
2p2ed
2p3k2
2p3n
2que.
2r2ed
2rab
2re.
2s1ab
2s1in
2s1m
2s3g
2s5peo
2sh.
2spa
2sper
2ss
2st.
2t1b
2t1ed
2t1f
2t1in
2t1n2
2t3up.
2tab
2taw
2th.
2ths
2ti2b
2tig
2tl
2tof
2trim
2tyl
2ui2
2us
2v1a4b
2vil
2wac
2z1i
2ze
3agog
3alyz
3analy
3away
3bet
3bi3tio
3bie
3bit5ua
3bod
3boo
3butio
3c4ut
3cei
3cell
3cenc
3cent
3cep
3cessi
3chemi
3chit
3cho2
3cia
3cili
3cinat
3cultu
3cun
3dat
3demic
3dict
3did
3dine.
3dle.
3dled
3dles.
3do.
3dos
3dox
3efit
3fich
3fu
3g4in.
3g4o4g
3gali
3gir
3giz
3glo
3go.
3guard
3gun
3gus
3hear
3hol4e
3hood
3isf
3ka.
3l4eri
3land
3lenc
3lerg
3less
3ley
3lidi
3ligh
3lik
3lo.
3logic
3logu
3ment
3mesti
3milia
3mind
3mous
3mum
3n4ia
3naut
3neo
3netic
3nitio
3noe
3nomic
3noun
3nu3it
3nu4n
3ogniz
3oncil
3opera
3orrh
3pare
3pay
3pe4a
3pede
3pedi
3phiz
3phob
3phone
3pi1o
3piec
3plan
3press
3pseu4d
3quer
3quet
3raphy
3rimo
3s4cie
3s4on.
3sanc
3sect
3ship
3side.
3sitio
3som
3spher
3store
3syl
3sync
3ta.
3tel.
3tenan
3tenc
3tend
3teu
3tex
3thet
3tien
3tine.
3tini
3tise
3tle.
3tled
3tles.
3tum
3ture
3tus
3ufa
3vat
3verse
3viv
3vok
3volv
3wise
3yar4
3ysis
4a2ci
4ab.
4abr
4adu
4ag4l
4ageu
4aldi
4allic
4alm
4alys
4ama
4and
4anto
4ao
4aphi
4as.
4ath
4ati.
4b1d
4b1m
4b1ora
4b3h
4b3n
4b5w
4be.
4be2d
4be5m
4bes4
4bp
4brit
4buta
4c3reta
4c3s2
4c5utiv
4cag4
4calo
4casy
4cativ
4ced.
4ceden
4ceni
4cesa
4ch.
4ch1in
4ch3ab
4ched
4chs.
4cier
4cii
4cipe
4cipic
4cista
4cisti
4clar
4clic
4corb
4cutr
4d1f
4d1n4
4d3alone
4d5la
4d5lu
4d5out
4daf
4dary
4dativ
4dato
4dee.
4dey
4dlead
4dless
4dli4e
4drai
4drow
4dry
4duct.
4ducts
4dup
4ed3d
4edi
4edo
4egal
4ella
4en3z
4enn
4eno
4enthes
4erand
4erati.
4erene
4erit
4ernit
4ertl
4eru
4es2to
4esh
4etn
4eu
4f1f
4f3ical
4f5b
4f5p
4fa4ma
4fag
4fato
4fd
4fe.
4feca
4fh
4ficate
4fics
4fily
4fm
4fn
4fug
4futa
4g1g2
4g1lish
4g3o3na
4gano
4gativ
4gaz
4gely
4geno
4geny
4geto
4go4niza
4grada
4graphy
4gray
4gress.
4grit
4gu4t
4h1l4
4h1m
4h1s2
4h5p
4hk
4hr4
4i1cr
4i2tic
4i5i4
4i5w
4ian4t
4ianc
4icam
4icar
4iceo
4ich
4if.
4ific.
4ift
4igi
4ik
4iln
4imet
4imit
4inav
4ind
4inga
4inge
4ingi
4ingo
4ingu
4ink
4inl
4iny
4io.
4ir
4is1s
4is4k
4ise
4isms
4istral
4ita.
4ita5m
4itia
4itis
4iton
4itt
4itz.
4iy
4izar
4jestie
4jesty
4k1s2
4kley
4kly
4l1c2
4l1g4
4l1r
4l4i4l
4l4iq
4lateli
4lativ
4lav
4len.
4leye
4lics
4lict.
4lj
4lof
4lov
4lt
4lup
4lya
4lyb
4m1b
4m1f
4m1l
4m1n
4m1p
4m1s2
4m3r
4m5c
4mald
4map
4matiza
4me.
4med.
4mene
4mith
4mk
4mocr
4mok
4mora.
4mt
4mup
4mw
4n1b4
4n1h4
4n1l
4n1n2
4n3o2d
4nac.
4nalt
4nare
4nene
4neski
4nesp
4nesw
4nian.
4nk2
4nog
4nop
4nosc
4nz
4o5ria
4oa
4operag
4oscopi
4oth
4p1b
4p1m
4p1p
4pe.
4pf
4pg
4ph.
4phs
4plig
4raril
4rh.
4rhal
4rici
4rs2
4s1er.
4s3f
4s4ed
4s5b
4s5d
4scei
4scopy
4se.
4seme
4senc
4sentd
4sentl
4servo
4shw
4signa
4sily
4ske
4sov
4spio
4spot
4st3w
4stry
4sv
4swo
4syc
4t1d
4t1g
4t1m
4t1p
4t1s2
4t1wa
4t3t2
4taci
4taf4
4talk
4tarc
4tare
4tatic
4tc
4te.
4teat
4tenes
4tes.
4tess
4tey
4thea
4thil
4thl
4thoo
4tian.
4tick
4timp
4todo
4tono
4tony
4tout
4trics
4trony
4tue
4tuf4
4tv
4two
4tya
4tz
4u1t2i
4uab
4uk
4ul3m
4uls
4ultu
4ura.
4ute.
4utel
4uten
4v3iden
4ve.
4ved
4ves.
4vi4na
4ving
4viti
4vity
4votee
4vv4
4wt
4y3h
4z1z2
4zb
4zm
5a5lyst
5a5si4t
5alyt
5anniz
5ba.
5blesp
5bor.
5bore
5bori
5bos4
5bust
5by.
5cel.
5chanic
5chine.
5chini
5chio
5cific.
5cino
5ciz
5clare
5colo
5crat.
5cratic
5cred
5criti
5culi
5da.
5dav4
5day
5dem.
5derm
5di.
5di3en
5dini
5disi
5doe
5dren
5drupli
5dyn
5efici
5egy
5elec
5emniz
5eniz
5erick
5erniz
5erwau
5eyc
5eye.
5far
5fect
5ferr
5ficia
5ficie
5fina
5fon
5g4ins
5gal.
5gesi
5gi.
5gicia
5gies.
5gio
5giv
5glas
5goe
5goo
5gos.
5graph.
5graphic
5gui5t
5hand.
5haz
5i5r2iz
5i5tick
5icap
5icra
5ie5ga
5initio
5iron.
5izont
5ja
5judg
5k2ic
5ki.
5leg.
5legg
5lene.
5lesq
5less.
5licio
5ligate
5litica
5long
5lope.
5los.
5losophiz
5losophy
5lumi
5lumnia
5magn
5mania
5maphro
5mate
5media
5metric
5mi.
5mocrat
5mocratiz
5mult
5neck
5nege
5nine.
5nis.
5nologis
5nop5o5li
5ocrit
5ommend
5pagan
5pathic
5phie
5phisti
5phoni
5phu
5pidi
5po4g
5pod.
5point
5poun
5preci
5pri4e
5pus
5pute
5reav
5ricid
5rigi
5riman
5rina.
5riph
5role.
5root
5rynge
5sa3tio
5sack
5sai
5saw
5scin4d
5se5um
5sei
5self
5selv
5sev
5sex
5shev
5sides
5sidi
5sine.
5sion
5siu
5siz
5smith
5solv
5sophic
5spai
5stand
5stat.
5stick
5stir
5stock
5stone
5stratu
5taboliz
5tect
5tels
5ter3d
5ternit
5think
5thodic
5tidi
5tigu
5tiq
5tistica
5tour
5tria
5tricia
5tro1leum
5tu3i
5turi
5u5tiz
5ulche
5va.
5vere.
5vian
5vide.
5vided
5vides
5vidi
5vilit
5vo.
5volt
5ynx
5zl
6rks.
a1j
a1tr
a1vor
a2d
a2f
a2go
a2mo
a2n
a2pl
a2ta
a2tom
a2tu
a2ty
a2va
a3cie
a3cio
a3dia
a3dio
a3dit
a3duc
a3ha
a3he
a3ho
a3ic.
a3nar
a3nati
a3nen
a3neu
a3nies
a3nip
a3niu
a3pher
a3pitu
a3pu
a3ree
a3riet
a3roo
a3sib
a3sic
a4cabl
a4car
a4gab
a4gy
a4i4n
a4lar
a4lenti
a4ly.
a4m5ato
a4matis
a4n1ic
a4peable
a4pilla
a4soc
a4tog
a4top
a4tos
a5bal
a5ban
a5ceou
a5chet
a5diu
a5guer
a5ia
a5le5o
a5log.
a5mon
a5nee
a5nimi
a5nine
a5nur
a5rade
a5ramete
a5ratio
a5rau
a5ress
a5roni
a5sia.
a5terna
a5then
a5tia
a5van
ab3ul
ab5erd
ab5it5ab
ab5lat
ab5o5liz
ab5rog
abe2
abi5a
ac1er
ac1in
ac3ul
ac4um
ac5ard
ac5aro
ac5rob
act5if
ad3ica
ad3ow
ad4din
ad4le
ad4su
ad5er.
ad5ran
ad5um
adi4er
ae4r
aeri4e
af6fish
aff4
ag1i
ag1n
ag3oni
ag5ell
ag5ul
aga4n
age4o
ah4l
ai2
ai5ly
ain5in
ain5o
ait5en
ak1en
al1i
al3ad
al3end
al4ia.
al5ab
al5lev
ali4e
am1in
am3ag
am3ic
am5ab
am5asc
am5era
am5if
am5ily
ama5ra
ami4no
amor5i
amp5en
an1dl
an1gl
an2sa
an2sp
an2tr
an3age
an3arc
an3dis
an3i3f
an3io
an3ish
an3it
an3ua
an3ul
an4dow
an4ime
an4kli
an4sco
an4sn
an4st
an4sur
an4tie
an4tw
an5est.
an5ot
anal6ys
anar4i
ande4s
ang5ie
ano4
anoa4c
anoth5
ans3po
antal4
anti3de
anti3n2
anti3re
ap3in
ap3ita
ap5at
ap5ero
ap5illar
ap5ola
apar4
apoc5
apor5i
apos3t
aps5es
aque5
ar1i
ar2iz
ar2mi
ar2p
ar2sh
ar3act
ar3al
ar3ent
ar3ian
ar3io
ar3q
ar4at
ar4chan
ar4dr
ar4fi
ar4fl
ar4im
ar4range
ar4sa
ar5adis
ar5ativ
ar5av4
ar5dine
ar5eas
ar5ial
ar5inat
ar5o5d
ara3p
aran4g
araw4
arbal4
arre4
as1tr
as3ant
as3ten
as4ab
as4l
as4sh
as5ph
as5ymptot
ashi4
ask3i
asur5a
at1ic
at3abl
at3alo
at3ego
at3en.
at3era
at3est
at3if
at3itu
at3ul
at3ura
at4ho
at4sk
at4tag
at4th
at5ac
at5ap
at5ech
at5ev
at5i5b
at5omiz
at5rop
at5te
at5ua
at5ue
at6tes.
ate5c
ater5n
ath5em
ath5om
ation5ar
au1th
au3gu
au3r
au4b
au4l2
au5sib
augh3
augh4tl
aun5d
aut5en
av1i
av3ag
av3era
av3ig
av3iou
av5ern
av5ery
av5oc
ave4no
avi4er
aw3i
aw4ly
aws4
ax4ic
ax4id
ay5al
aye4
ays4
azi4er
azz5i
b1j
b1v
b2be
b2l2
b3ber
b3lis
b3tr
b4le.
b4lo
b4to
b5itz
b5ota
b5uto
ba4ge
ba4z
ba6r1onie
bad5ger
bal1a
ban3i
ban4e
ban5dag
barbi5
bari4a
bas4si
bbi4na
bbi4t
be1li
be3da
be3de
be3di
be3gi
be3lo
be3sp
be3tw
be3w
be4vie
be5gu
be5nig
be5nu
be5str
be5tr
be5yo
beak4
beat3
bet5iz
bi2b
bi2t
bi3liz
bi3ogr
bi3orb
bi3tr
bi4d
bi4er
bi5en
bi5net
bi5ou
bid4if
bil4lab
bin4d
bina5r4
bio3rh
bio5m
bk4
blan4d
blath5
blen4
blin4d
blon4d
blun4t
bne5g
bo4e
bo4to
bo4tul
bod3i
bol3ic
bom4bi
bon4a
bon5at
bor5d
both5
bound3
broth3
brus4q
bsor4
bt4l
bu3li
bu3re
bu4ga
bu4n
buf4fer
bumi4
bunt4i
bus5ie
bus6i2er
bus6i2es
buss4e
buss4in
but4ed.
but4ted
bys4
c1ing
c1q
c2te
c2tro3me6c
c3c
c3ter
c3ume
c4ina
c4one
c4rin
c4ticu
c4tw
c4uf
c4ui
c5e4ta
c5ing.
c5laratio
c5n
c5tant
ca1bl
ca3lat
ca4th
ca5den
ca5per
cab3in
cach4
cad5em
cal4la
call5in
can3iz
can4e
can4ic
can4ty
can5d
can5is
cany4
car5om
cas5tig
cast5er
catas4
cav5al
ccha5
cci4a
ccompa5
ccon4
ccou3t
ce5ram
ces5si5b
ces5t
cet4
cew4
ch3er.
ch3ers
ch4ti
ch5a5nis
ch5ene
ch5iness
che2
che5lo
cheap3
chi2z
chs3hu
ci2a5b
ci3ph
ci4la
ci5c
cia5r
ciga3r
cin3em
cin4q
cion4
cit3iz
ck1
ck3i
cle4ar
cle4m
clim4
cly4
co3inc
co3pa
co4gr
co4pl
co5ag
co5zi
co6ph1o3n
coe2
coi4
col3or
col5i
com5er
con3g
con4a
con5t
cop3ic
coro3n
cos4e
cous4ti
cov1
cove4
cow5a
coz5e
cras5t
cre3at
cre4v
cri2
cri5f
cri5tie
cris4
cro4pl
cro5e4co
crop5o
cros4e
cru4d
ct5ang
cta4b
ctim3i
ctu4r
cu2ma
cu3pi
cu4mi
cu4ranc
cu4tie
cu5ity
cu5py
cu5ria
cud5
cul4tis
cur5a4b
cuss4i
cze4
d1b
d1d4
d1h2
d1if
d1in
d1j
d1m
d1p
d1u1a
d1uca
d1v
d1w
d2dib
d2es.
d2gy
d2iti
d2th
d2y
d3eq
d3ge4t
d3tab
d3ule
d4em
d4erh
d4ga
d4ice
d4is3t
d4og
d4or
d4sw
d4sy
d5c
d5k2
da2m2
dach4
dan3g
dard5
dark5
data3b
dav5e
de1p
de1sc
de1t
de1v
de2clin
de2pu
de2s5o
de2to
de3no
de3nu
de3pa
de3str
de4als.
de4bon
de4cil
de4mons
de4mos
de4nar
de4su
de4tic
de5com
de5fin5iti
de5if
de5lo
de5mil
deaf5
deb5it
decan4
del5i5q
deli4e
dem5ic.
demor5
denti5f
depi4
der5s
dern5iz
des2
des3ic
des3ti
dev3il
dg1i
di1re
di3ge
di4cam
di4lato
di4pl
di4ren
di4rer
di5niz
dia5b
dic5aid
dif5fra
dio5g
dir2
dirt5i
dis1
do3nat
do4la
do4v
do5de
do5lor
do5word
doli4
dom5iz
doni4
doo3d
dop4p
drag5on
dre4
drea5r
dri4b
drif4ta
dril4
dro4p
ds4p
du2c
du4g
du4n
du4pe
du5el
duc5er
dum4be
dy4se
dys5p
e1a4b
e1ce
e1cr
e1cu
e1f
e1h4
e1ing
e1j
e1la
e1les
e1me
e1or
e1po
e1q
e1ria4
e1rio
e1s2e
e1s4a
e1si
e1sp
e1vi
e1wa
e2col
e2cor
e2lis
e2mel
e2pa
e2s5im
e2sca
e2sec
e2sic
e2sid
e2sol
e2son
e2sur
e2vas
e3act
e3ass
e3br
e3chas
e3dia
e3fine
e3imb
e3inf
e3lea
e3libe
e3lier
e3lio
e3liv3
e3loa
e3my
e3new
e3nio
e3ny.
e3ol
e3pai
e3pent
e3pro
e3real
e3rien
e3scr
e3sha
e3ston
e3teo
e3tra
e3tre
e3up
e3wh
e3wit
e4a3tu
e4bel.
e4bels
e4ben
e4bit
e4cad
e4cib
e4clam
e4clus
e4comm
e4compe
e4conc
e4crem
e4cul
e4d1er
e4dol
e4dri
e4dul
e4f3ere
e4fic
e4fuse.
e4go.
e4gos
e4jud
e4l1er
e4l3ing
e4l5ic.
e4la.
e4lac
e4law
e4led
e4mac
e4mag
e4met
e4mis
e4mul
e4nant
e4nos
e4oi4
e4ot
e4pli
e4prec
e4pred
e4prob
e4put
e4q3ui3s
e4rian.
e4riva
e4sage.
e4sages
e4sert.
e4serts
e4serva
e4vin
e4wag
e5and
e5atif
e5cite
e5ex
e5git5
e5gur
e5ic
e5inst
e5ity
e5len
e5lim
e5loc
e5lud
e5man
e5miss
e5nea
e5nee
e5nie
e5nil
e5niu
e5of
e5out
e5ow
e5pel
e5roc
e5skin
e5stro
e5tide
